Colorado, session 2026A, HB1211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Broadband Resiliency, Public Safety, and Quality Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Access to high-speed and reliable broadband service is
essential for participation in the economy, education, and civic life;
(b) Colorado must ensure that the state's residents have access to
broadband networks that are resilient, high quality, and safe;
(c) Because voice-over-internet protocol service, or "VoIP
service", has replaced traditional voice telephone service for a large
segment of Colorado's population, ensuring the reliability of VoIP service
is in the public interest; and
(d) There is a need to address ambiguity in VoIP service
regulations in order to establish and enforce appropriate oversight and
regulation of broadband and VoIP services in order to meet the state's
goals of providing high-quality, affordable, and safe broadband and VoIP
services to Colorado residents.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-15-210 as
follows:
40-15-210. Regulation of broadband service and
voice-over-internet protocol service by commission - definitions -
rules.
-2- HB26-1211

(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "BROADBAND" OR "BROADBAND SERVICE" MEANS BROADBAND
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDED OVER A BROADBAND NETWORK AND
INCLUDES BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDED OVER LOW EARTH ORBIT
INTERNET SATELLITES.
(b) "INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER" MEANS A PERSON, A BUSINESS,
OR AN ORGANIZATION QUALIFIED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE THAT
PROVIDES INDIVIDUALS OR OTHER PERSONS WITH THE ABILITY TO CONNECT
TO THE INTERNET THROUGH USE OF A BROADBAND SERVICE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY REGULATE INTERNET SERVICE
PROVIDERS THAT PROVIDE BROADBAND SERVICE OR
VOICE-OVER-INTERNET PROTOCOL SERVICE IN THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION BY ADOPTING RULES TO REGULATE BROADBAND
SERVICE AND VOIP SERVICE WITH RESPECT TO:
(a) ESTABLISHING STANDARDS TO ENSURE THE RESILIENCY AND
RELIABILITY OF BROADBAND INFRASTRUCTURE;
(b) REQUIRING INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS TO SUBMIT
INFORMATION TO THE COMMISSION RELATED TO BROADBAND NETWORK
RELIABILITY, ADEQUACY, AND RESILIENCY;
(c) REQUIRING INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS TO REPORT
OUTAGES;
(d) ESTABLISHING SAFETY STANDARDS FOR BROADBAND
NETWORKS TO ENSURE PUBLIC SAFETY;
(e) REQUIRING INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS TO SUBMIT PLANS
RELATED TO EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND POST-EMERGENCY
BROADBAND NETWORK RESTORATION;
-3- HB26-1211

(f) ESTABLISHING MINIMUM POWER BACKUP REQUIREMENTS FOR
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS; AND
(g) REQUIRING INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS TO SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION DATA AND INFORMATION RELATED TO THE DEPLOYMENT,
AVAILABILITY, PRICING, AND ADOPTION OF BROADBAND SERVICE AND
VOIP SERVICE.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY CONDUCT EVALUATIONS AND AUDITS
REGARDING THE QUALITY, SAFETY, AND RESILIENCY OF AN INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER'S FACILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE USED TO PROVIDE
BROADBAND SERVICE OR VOIP SERVICE.
(4) (a) IF THE COMMISSION CONDUCTS AN EVALUATION OR AUDIT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AND FINDS THAT
THE PRACTICES, FACILITIES, INFRASTRUCTURE, OR SERVICE OF AN
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER IS INADEQUATE TO ENSURE THE BROADBAND
NETWORK'S QUALITY, RELIABILITY, OR SAFETY, OR IS IN VIOLATION OF ANY
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY ISSUE AN ORDER TO THE INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER
TO UNDERTAKE REMEDIAL ACTIONS.
(b) THE REMEDIAL ACTIONS ORDERED BY THE COMMISSION
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) REQUIRING AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER TO CONDUCT
MEASURES TO IMPROVE BROADBAND SERVICE OR CORRECT VIOLATIONS OF
THIS SECTION;
(II) REQUIRING AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER TO SUBMIT PLANS
TO THE COMMISSION THAT DETAIL HOW THE INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER
WILL RESOLVE ANY BROADBAND SERVICE ISSUES OR HOW THE INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER WILL CORRECT ANY VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION;
-4- HB26-1211

(III) PROHIBITING AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER FROM
CONDUCTING CERTAIN ACTIONS THAT MAY BE IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION;
(IV) REQUIRING AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER TO BUILD,
IMPROVE, OR REPAIR INFRASTRUCTURE OR FACILITIES RELATED TO
BROADBAND SERVICE THAT MAY BE CAUSING ISSUES OF NETWORK
RELIABILITY, SAFETY, OR AFFORDABILITY OR THAT ARE CAUSING
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(V) ISSUING FINES TO AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER THAT
VIOLATES THIS SECTION OR RULES ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(c) THE COMMISSION SHALL CREDIT ANY FINES COLLECTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(5) (a) ON AND AFTER SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON AND AFTER
SEPTEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY RELATED TO THE QUALITY,
RESILIENCY, AND SAFETY OF THE STATE'S BROADBAND SERVICE AND VOIP
SERVICE.
(b) THE REPORT CONDUCTED BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (5) MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION, WITH
RESPECT TO THE PRIOR YEAR:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF PEOPLE IN COLORADO THAT ARE RECEIVING
BROADBAND SERVICE FROM INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS;
(II) BROADBAND SERVICE PERFORMANCE DATA AND
MEASUREMENTS RELATED TO THE QUALITY, RELIABILITY, SAFETY, AND
AFFORDABILITY OF BROADBAND SERVICE, AS COMPARED TO ESTABLISHED
INDUSTRY STANDARDS FOR BROADBAND SERVICE PERFORMANCE;
-5- HB26-1211

(III) A LIST OF BROADBAND SERVICE OUTAGES THAT OCCURRED
WITHIN EACH INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER'S SERVICE TERRITORY AND
HOW THE SERVICE OUTAGES WERE RESOLVED;
(IV) ANY VIOLATIONS THAT THE COMMISSION FOUND AGAINST
AND ANY FINES THAT THE COMMISSION ISSUED TO AN INTERNET SERVICE
PROVIDER FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND THE OUTCOME OF THE VIOLATIONS
FOUND; AND
(V) ANY OTHER INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE QUALITY,
RELIABILITY, SAFETY, AND AFFORDABILITY OF BROADBAND SERVICE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(c) THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT PREPARED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5) TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
BUSINESS AFFAIRS AND LABOR COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE BUSINESS,
LABOR, AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES.
(d) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT ANY RULES NECESSARY RELATED
TO THE SUBMISSION OR COLLECTION OF INFORMATION FROM AN INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER IN ORDER TO CONDUCT THE REPORT REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5).
(e) THE REPORTS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION ARE EXEMPT FROM SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-15-401, amend
(1)(c), (1)(i), and (1)(q); and repeal (1)(r) as follows:
40-15-401. Services, products, and providers exempt from
regulation - definition.
(1) The following products, services, and providers are exempt
-6- HB26-1211

from regulation under this article 15 or under the "Public Utilities Law"
of the state of Colorado:
(c) Commercial mobile radio services; EXCEPT THAT THE
COMMISSION MAY REGULATE BROADBAND SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 40-15-210;
(i) Information services; EXCEPT THAT THE COMMISSION MAY
REGULATE BROADBAND SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
40-15-210;
(q) Internet-protocol-enabled services; EXCEPT THAT THE
COMMISSION MAY REGULATE BROADBAND SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 40-15-210;
(r) Voice-over-internet protocol service;
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- HB26-1211